resultats/hunspell/catalan-valencia.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: veure
SFX 9C Y 94
SFX 9C e e/_v_D_Y re
SFX 9C ure ient/_C re
SFX 9C ure ent/_C re
SFX 9C eure ist/_v_Y re
SFX 9C eure ista/_Y re
SFX 9C eure istos/_Y re
SFX 9C eure ists/_Y re
SFX 9C eure istes/_Y re
SFX 9C ure ig/_Z re
SFX 9C re s/_Z re
SFX 9C re 0/_Z re
SFX 9C ure iem/_Z re
SFX 9C ure em/_Z re
SFX 9C ure im/_Z re
SFX 9C ure ieu/_Z re
SFX 9C ure eu/_Z re
SFX 9C ure is/_Z re
SFX 9C re en/_Z re
SFX 9C ure ia/_Z re
SFX 9C ure ies/_Z re
SFX 9C ure ia/_Z re
SFX 9C eure èiem/_Z re
SFX 9C eure éiem/_Z re
SFX 9C eure èieu/_Z re
SFX 9C eure éieu/_Z re
SFX 9C ure ien/_Z re
SFX 9C eure iu/_Z re
SFX 9C ure ieres/_Z re
SFX 9C ure res/_Z re
SFX 9C ure ié/_Z re
SFX 9C eure éu/_Z re
SFX 9C ure iérem/_Z re
SFX 9C eure érem/_Z re
SFX 9C ure iéreu/_Z re
SFX 9C eure éreu/_Z re
SFX 9C ure ieren/_Z re
SFX 9C ure ren/_Z re
SFX 9C e é/_Z re
SFX 9C e às/_Z re
SFX 9C e à/_Z re
SFX 9C e em/_Z re
SFX 9C e eu/_Z re
SFX 9C e an/_Z re
SFX 9C e ia/_Z re
SFX 9C e ies/_Z re
SFX 9C e ia/_Z re
SFX 9C e íem/_Z re
SFX 9C e íeu/_Z re
SFX 9C e ien/_Z re
SFX 9C ure ja/_Z re
SFX 9C ure gi/_Z re
SFX 9C ure ges/_Z re
SFX 9C ure gis/_Z re
SFX 9C ure ja/_Z re
SFX 9C ure gi/_Z re
SFX 9C ure gem/_Z re
SFX 9C ure geu/_Z re
SFX 9C ure gen/_Z re
SFX 9C ure gin/_Z re
SFX 9C ure iés/_Z re
SFX 9C ure ra/_Z re
SFX 9C ure s/_Z re
SFX 9C ure iessis/_Z re
SFX 9C ure res/_Z re
SFX 9C ure ssis/_Z re
SFX 9C ure iesses/_Z re
SFX 9C ure iés/_Z re
SFX 9C ure ra/_Z re
SFX 9C ure s/_Z re
SFX 9C ure iéssim/_Z re
SFX 9C eure érem/_Z re
SFX 9C eure éssim/_Z re
SFX 9C ure iéssem/_Z re
SFX 9C ure iéssiu/_Z re
SFX 9C eure éreu/_Z re
SFX 9C eure éssiu/_Z re
SFX 9C ure iésseu/_Z re
SFX 9C ure iessin/_Z re
SFX 9C ure ren/_Z re
SFX 9C ure ssin/_Z re
SFX 9C ure iessen/_Z re
SFX 9C ure ges/_C re
SFX 9C ure s/_C re
SFX 9C ure t/_C re
SFX 9C ure ja/_D re
SFX 9C ure gi/_D re
SFX 9C ure gem/_C re
SFX 9C ure g/_C re
SFX 9C ure geu/_C re
SFX 9C ure ieu/_C re
SFX 9C ure eu/_C re
SFX 9C ure is/_C re
SFX 9C ure gen/_C re
SFX 9C ure gin/_C re

# Model de conjugació: voler
SFX 9D Y 80
SFX 9D r r/_v_C_Y er
SFX 9D r nt/_C er
SFX 9D er gut/_v_Y er
SFX 9D er guda/_Y er
SFX 9D er guts/_Y er
SFX 9D er gudes/_Y er
SFX 9D oler ull/_Z er
SFX 9D er s/_Z er
SFX 9D er 0/_Z er
SFX 9D r m/_Z er
SFX 9D r u/_Z er
SFX 9D r n/_Z er
SFX 9D er ia/_Z er
SFX 9D er ies/_Z er
SFX 9D er ia/_Z er
SFX 9D er íem/_Z er
SFX 9D er íeu/_Z er
SFX 9D er ien/_Z er
SFX 9D er guí/_Z er
SFX 9D er gueres/_Z er
SFX 9D er gué/_Z er
SFX 9D er guérem/_Z er
SFX 9D er guéreu/_Z er
SFX 9D er gueren/_Z er
SFX 9D er dré/_Z er
SFX 9D er dràs/_Z er
SFX 9D er drà/_Z er
SFX 9D er drem/_Z er
SFX 9D er dreu/_Z er
SFX 9D er dran/_Z er
SFX 9D er dria/_Z er
SFX 9D er dries/_Z er
SFX 9D er dria/_Z er
SFX 9D er dríem/_Z er
SFX 9D er dríeu/_Z er
SFX 9D er drien/_Z er
SFX 9D oler ulga/_Z er
SFX 9D oler ullga/_Z er
SFX 9D oler ulgui/_Z er
SFX 9D oler ulgues/_Z er
SFX 9D oler ullgues/_Z er
SFX 9D oler ulguis/_Z er
SFX 9D oler ulga/_Z er
SFX 9D oler ullga/_Z er
SFX 9D oler ulgui/_Z er
SFX 9D oler ulguem/_Z er
SFX 9D oler ullguem/_Z er
SFX 9D oler ulgueu/_Z er
SFX 9D oler ullgueu/_Z er
SFX 9D oler ulguen/_Z er
SFX 9D oler ullguen/_Z er
SFX 9D oler ulguin/_Z er
SFX 9D er gués/_Z er
SFX 9D er guera/_Z er
SFX 9D er guessis/_Z er
SFX 9D er gueres/_Z er
SFX 9D er guesses/_Z er
SFX 9D er gués/_Z er
SFX 9D er guera/_Z er
SFX 9D er guéssim/_Z er
SFX 9D er guérem/_Z er
SFX 9D er guéssem/_Z er
SFX 9D er guéssiu/_Z er
SFX 9D er guéreu/_Z er
SFX 9D er guésseu/_Z er
SFX 9D er guessin/_Z er
SFX 9D er gueren/_Z er
SFX 9D er guessen/_Z er
SFX 9D oler ulgues/_C er
SFX 9D oler ullgues/_C er
SFX 9D oler ulga/_D er
SFX 9D oler ullga/_D er
SFX 9D oler ulgui/_D er
SFX 9D oler ulguem/_C er
SFX 9D oler ullguem/_C er
SFX 9D oler ulgueu/_C er
SFX 9D oler ullgueu/_C er
SFX 9D oler ulguen/_C er
SFX 9D oler ullguen/_C er
SFX 9D oler ulguin/_C er

# Model de conjugació: vore
SFX 9E Y 13
SFX 9E e e/_v_D_Y re
SFX 9E e é/_Z re
SFX 9E e às/_Z re
SFX 9E e à/_Z re
SFX 9E e em/_Z re
SFX 9E e eu/_Z re
SFX 9E e an/_Z re
SFX 9E e ia/_Z re
SFX 9E e ies/_Z re
SFX 9E e ia/_Z re
SFX 9E e íem/_Z re
SFX 9E e íeu/_Z re
SFX 9E e ien/_Z re
